Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
In General

§ 39-17-1.
Recognition of need for Sports Hall of Fame.

The Legislature recognizes the need for a Sports Hall of Fame to honor Mississippians who have made significant contributions to Mississippi through sports. The Legislature further recognizes that a Sports Hall of Fame would be of great economic and cultural importance to Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1993).

§ 39-17-3.
Site of Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum.

The Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum may be constructed on property currently owned by the state and located adjacent to the Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum in Jackson, Mississippi, or on property located adjacent to the Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum and conveyed to the state by the City of Jackson. The Department of Finance and Administration may enter into agreement with the governing authorities of the City of Jackson for the movement and relocation of exhibits housed in the currently existing Dizzy Dean Museum.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 489, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1993).

§ 39-17-5.
Funding of facility; special account.

The Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum shall be funded, in part, by the sale of exclusive rights to market soft drinks at the State Fairgrounds, the Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum and the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum; however, the sale of such rights for the state fairgrounds shall include the Mississippi State Fair and the Dixie National Livestock Show and Rodeo and no other event or activity on the state fairgrounds. The Mississippi Fair Commission and the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall have the authority to enter contracts for the sale of the aforementioned exclusive rights for a term not exceeding twelve (12) years per contract. If bids for the purchase of such rights are in an amount that is less than the amount needed to construct the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum, then the Mississippi Fair Commission and the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce may reject all bids and shall not be obligated to enter into such contracts. Funds so generated shall be deposited in a special, interest-bearing account, in the State Treasury to be administered by the Department of Finance and Administration. The account shall be known as the “Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum Account” and all interest accrued thereon shall be credited to the account. Any funds in the account shall not lapse into the General Fund at the end of the fiscal year but shall remain in the account. Any balance remaining at the end of the project shall be transferred to the operating account of the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 489, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1993).

§ 39-17-7.
Construction, furnishing and equipping of facility.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall proceed with constructing, furnishing and equipping the facility as soon as practicable after April 1, 1993.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 489, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1993).

§ 39-17-9.
Lease of facility to nonprofit corporation [Repealed effective July 1, 2036].

The Department of Finance and Administration may lease the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum for a period not exceeding twenty (20) years to a nonprofit corporation whose primary purpose for incorporation is the support and improvement of the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Dizzy Dean Museum. The lease may be renewed for one (1) period not exceeding twenty (20) years.

The benefit to Mississippi from the operation of such lease or renewal lease shall be considered as sufficient consideration. The lease or renewal lease shall be executed for a nominal fee and it shall be presumed that such lease or renewal lease shall not amount to a donation of state property.

This section shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2036.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 489, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 398, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2016).